Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 4. State Range Areas.

Sec. 16.20.300.
Delta Junction Bison Range Area.

The following described areas, excluding valid existing rights, are established as the Delta Junction Bison Range Area:

Township 11 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 12 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 12 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 12 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 12 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 13 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 13 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 13 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 14 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 14 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 14 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Section 28: S 1/2 SW 1/4, SW 1/4 SE 1/4 and that portion of the NW 1/4 SW 1/4 east of the west bank of Granite Creek excluding A.S.L.S. 78-93, Tract A, Unit 1

Sections 29, 32: that land east of the west bank of Granite Creek

Section 33: all, excluding A.S.L.S. 78-93, Tract A, Unit 1

Section 34: S 1/2 NW 1/4, excluding A.S.L.S. 78-93, Tract A, Unit 1, S 1/2

Section 35: S 1/2, S 1/2 NW 1/4, that portion of the NE 1/4 lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway

Section 36: that portion lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway;

Sections 13, 24—26, 35, 36: all

Sections 1, 11, 12, 14, 22, 23, 27, 34: that land east of the west bank of Granite Creek;

Sections 1—4, 7—25, 30, 36: all

Sections 5, 6: that land east of the west bank of Granite Creek;

Sections 5, 6, 9: that portion lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway

Section 7: all

Section 8: all, excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the Alaska Highway

Section 10: that portion of the SW 1/4 lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway

Section 14: S 1/2 S 1/2 SW 1/4

Section 15: S 1/2, NW 1/4, excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the Alaska Highway

Sections 16-22: all

Section 23: S 1/2, NW 1/4, S 1/2 NE 1/4, S 1/2 N 1/2 NE 1/4

Section 24: SW 1/4, S 1/2 NW 1/4, excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the Alaska Highway, S 1/2 S 1/2 SE 1/4

Sections 25-36: all;

Sections 19, 28-30, 33-35: that portion lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway

Sections 31, 32: all;

Sections 1-5, 9-15, 23-25, 36: all;

Section 1: that portion lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway

Sections 2-36: all;

Sections 5, 6, 8-10, 15: that portion lying south of the Alaska Highway excluding a corridor extending 1320 feet from the centerline of the highway

Sections 7, 16-20, 30: all

Sections 21, 22, 28, 29, 31, 32: that portion lying west of the east bank of the Little Gerstle River;

Section 1: that portion lying west of the east bank of the Little Gerstle River

Sections 2-6: all;

Section 1: all;

Section 6: that portion lying west of the east bank of the Little Gerstle River.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1979)

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose, see sec. 1, ch. 39, SLA 1979 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.20.310.
Game management plan for bison.

The commissioner shall develop and may amend a game management plan for bison in the area described in AS

16.20.300

. After holding public hearings in accordance with AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act), the commissioner shall implement the game management plan.

The game management plan must include, but is not limited to

planting grains for bison and planting other wildlife forage;

altering existing plant cover to create additional range and year-round habitat for bison and other animal species in the area;

tilling to produce forage.

The commissioner shall develop and amend the game management plan to coordinate, as closely as possible, the game management plan with the activities of the Department of Natural Resources relating to the Big Delta agricultural development project.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1979; am § 29 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(1), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 16.20.315.
Bison range timber sales.

The Department of Natural Resources, division of forestry, shall provide for the sale of timber in the Delta Junction bison range area in a manner that does not delay implementation of the game management plan required under AS

16.20.310

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 118 SLA 1984)

Sec. 16.20.320.
Activities on bison range area.

Nothing in AS

16.20.300

—

16.20.320

shall be construed as prohibiting activities on land described in AS

16.20.300

that are otherwise permitted in accordance with the laws and regulations of this state, including, but not limited to, hunting, trapping, engaging in recreational activities, using the land for access to adjacent areas, and a 300-foot Alaska Railroad right-of-way.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1979)

Sec. 16.20.340.
Purpose of Matanuska Valley Moose Range.

The purpose of AS

16.20.340

—

16.20.360

is to establish the area described in AS

16.20.360

as the Matanuska Valley Moose Range.
The primary purposes of the Matanuska Valley Moose Range are to maintain, improve, and enhance moose populations and habitat and other wildlife resources of the area, and to perpetuate public multiple use of the area, including fishing, grazing, forest management, hunting, trapping, mineral and coal entry and development, and other forms of public use of public land not incompatible with the purpose stated in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1984)

Sec. 16.20.350.
Management responsibility for moose range.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources on the state land and water described in AS

16.20.360

consistent with the purposes of AS

16.20.340

—

16.20.360

.

Management of the surface and subsurface estate is the responsibility of the Department of Natural Resources. After adequate public hearings the Department of Natural Resources shall develop and adopt a management plan for the Matanuska Valley Moose Range that shall reflect the concurrence of the Department of Fish and Game. The management plan shall be adopted, implemented, and maintained within three years of the establishment of the Matanuska Valley Moose Range. The management plan shall be revised, if necessary and appropriate, under the same procedure followed for initial adoption. The plan shall provide for roadside recreation sites, including picnicking and camping areas.

The Department of Natural Resources may, after consultation with the Department of Fish and Game, adopt regulations governing the public use of the area. The regulations must include provisions for multiple use, as defined in AS

38.04.910

, and for public multiple uses listed in AS

16.20.340

. Regulations adopted for the Matanuska Valley Moose Range do not apply to private land within the boundary described in AS

16.20.360

.

The area shall be managed to sustain fish and wildlife resources in perpetuity, according to the principle of sustained yield.

The commissioner of natural resources may acquire in the name of the state, by negotiated purchase only, without an option of first purchase, title or interest in real property lying within the boundaries of the Matanuska Valley Moose Range. The land described herein is to be managed by the Department of Natural Resources.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1984)

Sec. 16.20.360.
Matanuska Valley Moose Range established.

The state-owned land and water, vacant and unappropriated, and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the boundary described in this section, are designated as the Matanuska Valley Moose Range, and are reserved from all uses incompatible with their primary purposes as public use land. The land described herein is to be managed by the Department of Natural Resources.

Township 18 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian

Township 22 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Section 1;

Sections 4
—
6;

Section 13

Sections 24
—
25

Section 36;

Section 1

Section 2, E 1/2

Section 10, S 1/2

Sections 11
—
34

Section 35, N 1/2;

Sections 1
—
32, that portion lying north of the Glenn Highway right-of-way;

Section 1, N 1/2, SW 1/4

Sections 2
—
10

Section 11, N 1/2 NE 1/4, SW 1/4 NE 1/4, NW 1/4, NW 1/4 SW 1/4

Section 15, W 1/2 NW 1/4, NE 1/4 NW 1/4

Section 16, E 1/2 NE 1/4, N 1/2 S 1/2 that portion north and east of the Glenn Highway right-of-way;

Section 6, NW 1/4, N 1/2 NE 1/4;

Section 1

Sections 12
—
13

Sections 24
—
25

Section 36;

Section 5, W 1/2

Sections 6
—
7

Sections 11
—
13

Sections 18
—
19

Sections 24
—
25

Section 30, N 1/2

Sections 31
—
33, S 1/2

Sections 34
—
36;

Section 5, W 1/2

Section 6

Section 7, N 1/2

Sections 12
—
13

Sections 21
—
36;

Section 5

Section 6, E 1/2

Sections 7
—
8

Section 12, S 1/2

Sections 13
—
32

Section 33, SW 1/4 NE 1/4, N 1/2 NE 1/4, SW 1/4 SW 1/4, N 1/2 SW 1/4, NW 1/4

Section 34, N 1/2 N 1/2;

Sections 1
—
12

Section 14, N 1/2

Sections 15
—
21

Section 22, NW 1/4, N 1/2 NE 1/4

Section 29, W 1/2, those portions lying north of the right-of-way for the Glenn Highway

Section 30, those portions lying north of the right-of-way for the Glenn Highway;

Section 6;

Section 25

Section 36;

Section 25

Section 29, W 1/2

Sections 30
—
31

Section 32, W 1/2

Section 36, N 1/2;

Section 12, W 1/2

Section 13

Section 20

Section 21, S 1/2

Section 24, E 1/2

Section 28

Section 29, E 1/2

Section 30, S 1/2

Sections 31
—
32;

Section 3

Section 9

Section 10, W 1/2

Sections 16
—
17

Sections 19
—
20

Section 21, N 1/2

Section 29, W 1/2

Sections 30
—
31

Section 32, W 1/2;

Section 2

Section 3, E 1/2

Section 10

Section 11, W 1/2

Section 14, W 1/2

Section 15

Sections 21
—
22

Section 23, W 1/2

Sections 28
—
29

Sections 31
—
36;

Sections 27
—
28

Sections 31
—
32

Section 33, N 1/2

Section 34, N 1/2;

Section 23

Section 26

Section 35.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1984)